Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.484

Health care service contracts—Transferred employees of vocational-technical institutes.

The state employees' benefit board shall adopt rules to preclude any preexisting conditions or limitations in existing health care service contracts for school district employees at vocational-technical institutes transferred to the state board for community and technical colleges. The board shall also provide for the disposition of any dividends or refundable reserves in the school district's health care service contracts applicable to vocational-technical institute employees.

[ 1991 c 238 s 137.]